New York, session 2025-2026, S10616.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 7 of section 64 of the alcoholic beverage 2 control law is amended by adding a new paragraph (e-18) to read as 3 follows: 4 (e-18) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (a) of this subdi- 5 vision the authority may issue restaurant licenses for a premises which 6 shall be within two hundred feet of a building occupied exclusively as a 7 school, church, synagogue, or other place of worship, provided such 8 premises is being conducted as a restaurant located wholly within the 9 boundaries of the borough of Manhattan, city of New York, county of New 10 York, bounded and described as follows: 11 BEGINNING at the corner formed by the intersection of the southerly 12 side of 16th Street with the westerly side of Irving Place: running 13 thence westerly along the southerly side of 16th Street 100 feet; thence 14 southerly parallel with Irving Place 103 feet 3 inches to the center 15 line of the block; thence easterly along the center line of the block 20 16 feet; thence southerly parallel with the westerly side of Irving Place 17 40 feet 9 inches; thence easterly parallel with the southerly side of 18 16th Street and part of the way through a party wall 80 feet to the 19 westerly side of Irving Place; thence northerly along the westerly side 20 of Irving Place, 144 feet to the point or place of BEGINNING. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15993-01-6